South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3584.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  (A) Notwithstanding the provisions of Chapter 47, Title 2 of the S.C. Code, Section 1-11-58, the annual appropriations act, or another provision of law, the South Carolina Department of Administration, or its successor state agency, is authorized to transfer ownership of Dargan's Pond, an approximate fifty acre lake located at the Pee Dee Research and Education Center on Pee Dee R C Road in Darlington County, South Carolina, 29532, from Clemson University to Francis Marion University upon consent of both the transferring and receiving university and their execution of an agreement providing for such transfer. The provisions of this subsection authorizing the transfer of ownership of Dargan's Pond from Clemson University to Francis Marion University are contingent upon Francis Marion University's receipt of appropriated or allocated funds or other resources sufficient to effect any necessary repairs to the pond and surrounding area. (B) The agreement required pursuant to subsection (A) shall not require the exchange of monetary consideration, but shall require Francis Marion University to assume all responsibility for the pond and any necessary repairs to the pond and surrounding area, with the understanding that both universities will cooperate with the South Carolina Emergency Management Division and the Federal Emergency Management Agency in efforts to obtain grants that may be available to fund such repairs. The agreement also may provide for the transfer of land contiguous to the pond or portions of the pond, any easement required by either university, the continuation of any lease or easement currently in effect on the property, or any other term or condition needed by the universities or necessary to accomplish the transfer. (C) The provisions of this joint resolution represent specific authorization to transfer ownership of Dargan's Pond from Clemson University to Francis Marion University and no further approval shall be required to accomplish the transfer or effectuate any aspect of any agreement reached by the universities. SECTION 2.  This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----